Massachusetts, session 194th, S269.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 12C of chapter 138 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the figure “18”, in line 15, the following words:-
“or a retailer licensed pursuant to section 15”.
of 1